Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-2103
Information for parents of newborn child; requirements.

Every hospital, birth center, or other medical facility that discharges a newborn child shall request that each maternity patient and father of a newborn child, if available, view a video presentation and read printed materials, approved by the Department of Health and Human Services, on the dangers of shaking infants and children, the symptoms of abusive head trauma in infants and children, the dangers associated with rough handling or the striking of an infant, safety measures which can be taken to prevent sudden infant death and abusive head trauma in infants and children, including crying plans, and the dangers associated with infants sleeping on the same surface with other children or adults. After viewing the presentation and reading the materials or upon a refusal to do so, the hospital, birth center, or other medical facility shall request that the mother and father, if available, sign a form stating that he or she has viewed and read or refused to view and read the presentation and materials. Such presentation, materials, and forms may be provided by the department.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 149;

Laws 2019, LB60, § 3.